Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.170

Credit for military service.

(1) A member who has served or shall serve on active federal service in the military or naval forces of the United States and who left or shall leave an employer to enter such service shall be deemed to be on military leave of absence if he or she has resumed or shall resume employment as an employee within one year from termination thereof.

(2) If he or she has applied or shall apply for reinstatement of employment, within one year from termination of the military service, and is refused employment for reasons beyond his or her control, he or she shall, upon resumption of service within ten years have such service credited to him or her.

(3) In any event, after completing twenty-five years of creditable service, any member may have service in the armed forces credited to him or her as a member whether or not he or she left the employ of an employer to enter the armed service: PROVIDED, That in no instance, described in this section, shall military service in excess of five years be credited: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That in each instance the member must restore all withdrawn accumulated contributions, which restoration must be completed within five years of membership service following the first resumption of employment or complete twenty-five years of creditable service: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That this section will not apply to any individual, not an honorably discharged veteran or veteran who received a physical discharge from the armed forces with an honorable record. Furthermore, an individual must prove that their military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005.

(4)(a) A member, after completing twenty-five years of creditable service, who would have otherwise become eligible for a retirement benefit as defined under this chapter while serving honorably in the armed forces, and with service during a period of war as referenced in RCW 41.04.005, shall, upon application to the department, be eligible to receive credit for this service without returning to covered employment.

(b) Service credit granted under (a) of this subsection applies only to honorably discharged veterans or veterans who received a physical discharge with an honorable record whose military service was during a period of war as defined in RCW 41.04.005.

(5) The surviving spouse or eligible child or children of a member who left the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and died while serving in the uniformed services may, on behalf of the deceased member, apply for retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of the member's death in the uniformed services. The department shall establish the deceased member's service credit if the surviving spouse or eligible child or children:

(a) Provides to the director proof of the member's death while serving in the uniformed services; and

(b) Provides to the director proof of the member's honorable service in the uniformed services prior to the date of death.

(6) A member who leaves the employ of an employer to enter the uniformed services of the United States and becomes totally incapacitated for continued employment by an employer while serving in the uniformed services is entitled to retirement system service credit under this subsection up to the date of discharge from the uniformed services if:

(a) The member obtains a determination from the director that he or she is totally incapacitated for continued employment due to conditions or events that occurred while serving in the uniformed services; and

(b) The member provides to the director proof of honorable discharge from the uniformed services.

[ 2024 c 146 s 20. Prior: 2005 c 247 s 2; 2005 c 64 s 1; 2002 c 27 s 2; 1991 c 35 s 78; 1981 c 294 s 12; 1973 1st ex.s. c 190 s 14; 1972 ex.s. c 151 s 3; 1969 c 128 s 7; 1967 c 127 s 8; 1963 c 174 s 10; 1953 c 200 s 9; 1949 c 240 s 12; 1947 c 274 s 18; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 11072-18.]

NOTES:

Intent—2024 c 146: See note following RCW 73.04.005.

Severability—Effective date—2005 c 247: See notes following RCW 41.04.005.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Severability—1981 c 294: See note following RCW 41.26.115.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 190: See note following RCW 41.40.010.

Severability—1969 c 128: See note following RCW 41.40.010.